Washington statutes.
RCW 27.04.010

Library created—Rule-making authority—Appointment of state librarian.

(1) There shall be a state library within the office of the secretary of state, and a state librarian to serve as its chief executive officer.

(2) The secretary of state may make such rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(3) The secretary of state shall appoint a state librarian who shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary of state.

[ 2002 c 342 s 2; 1999 c 123 s 1; 1943 c 207 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8225-1. Prior: See Reviser's note below.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: For prior laws on this subject, see Laws 1929 c 159; 1921 c 7 s 13; 1913 c 72; 1903 c 171; 1901 c 43 and 46; 1893 c 63; 1891 c 37; Code 1881 ss 2588-2613.